Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-610
False representation as officer or employee of commission; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to falsely represent himself or herself to be an officer or employee of the commission or to assume to so act without having been duly appointed or employed as such. Any person willfully representing himself or herself to be such officer or employee shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VI, § 5, p. 434;

C.S.1929, § 37-605;

Laws 1937, c. 89, § 16, p. 299;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 37-605;

R.S.1943, § 37-605;

Laws 1957, c. 139, § 13, p. 471;

Laws 1961, c. 175, § 2, p. 523;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 200;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-605;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 300.